Mississippi statutes. Title 59. Ports, Harbors, Landings and Watercraft
Chapter 9. County Port Authority or Development Commission
§ 59-9-67.
Reclamation of submerged lands and tidelands; conveyance of lands by state; lease or sale of lands and facilities by county.

For the purposes set out in subsection (1) of Section 59-9-65, the board of supervisors of such county, acting by and through the county port authority, and with the supervision and approval of the Mississippi Agricultural and Industrial Board, shall have the power to dredge, fill in and reclaim submerged lands and tidelands belonging to the State of Mississippi; and the state land commissioner, with the approval of the attorney general and the governor, is hereby authorized and empowered to convey such reclaimed submerged lands and tidelands to such county and to issue the state’s patent therefor, but all oil, gas and other minerals in, on or under said lands are hereby specifically reserved unto the State of Mississippi. Such county, acting through its county port authority, shall have the further power to develop and utilize such lands for any of such purposes, provided, however, that no normal or natural channel shall be obstructed so as to interfere with the normal navigation therein.

The board of supervisors of such county, acting jointly with the county port authority, and with the approval of the Mississippi Agricultural and Industrial Board, shall have the power to lease such lands, for a term not in excess of ninety-nine years from the date of such lease, or to sell or otherwise dispose of such land to the State of Mississippi, or to individuals, firms or corporations, public or private, for industrial operations, on such terms and conditions and with such safeguards as will best promote and protect the public interest, and they are hereby authorized to transfer possession and/or title to any part or all of such lands by deed, lease, contract, or other customary business instrument.

Any facilities constructed or acquired for use on such lands under the provisions of Section 59-5-11, including, but not limited to machinery or equipment, may be leased for a term not in excess of ninety-nine years from the date of such lease, or sold, or otherwise disposed of to the State of Mississippi or to individuals, firms or corporations, public or private, for industrial operations, on such terms and conditions, with such safeguards as will best promote and protect the public interest, and subject to the limitations set out in Section 59-5-11, and the board of supervisors of such county, acting jointly with the county port authority, and with the approval of the Mississippi Agricultural and Industrial Board, is authorized to transfer possession and/or title to any part, or all of such facilities, machinery or equipment by deed, lease, contract, or other customary business instrument.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7605-23; Laws, 1956, ch. 199, § 23; Laws, 1967, Ex. Sess. ch. 6, §§ 1-3, eff from and after passage (approved June 29, 1967).

§ 59-9-69.
Additional general obligation bonds.

In addition to the authority set out in subsection (1) of Section 59-9-65, the board of supervisors of such county may issue general obligation bonds of such county in the additional maximum principal amount of five million dollars ($5,000,000.00), to provide funds for any purposes authorized by Sections 59-9-17 through 59-9-23. Such bonds shall be issued as provided in subsections (2), (3), (4) and (5) of Section 59-9-65, Section 59-9-73, and subsection (2) of Section 59-9-75.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7605-23; Laws, 1956, ch. 199, § 23; Laws, 1967, Ex. Sess. ch. 6, §§ 1-3, eff from and after passage (approved June 29, 1967).

§ 59-9-71.
Dredging and site preparation; fund.

The Mississippi Agricultural and Industrial Board shall assist and supervise the dredging of channel and harbor and preparation of site for the construction of ships, vessels, shipyards, shipbuilding facilities, machinery and equipment, dredges, floating drydocks, graving docks, marine railways, tug boats, or any other facilities required or incidental to the construction, outfitting, drydocking or repair of ships or vessels as contemplated by Sections 59-9-65 and 59-9-67. All sums of money received or obtained by the agricultural and industrial board under the provisions of Sections 59-9-65 through 59-9-75, by appropriation or otherwise, shall be paid into the state treasury and shall constitute a fund to be known as the “agricultural and industrial dredging and site preparation fund.” All expenditures shall be paid therefrom by the state treasurer on warrant of the auditor of public accounts; and said auditor shall issue his warrant upon requisition signed by the director and the secretary of the agricultural and industrial board.

To the extent that funds may be available, the agricultural and industrial board shall join with any board of supervisors acting under authority of subsection (1) of Section 59-9-65 in contracting for the work contemplated by said Sections 59-9-65 and 59-9-67, and shall pay from the “agricultural and industrial dredging and site preparation fund” eighty per cent (80%) of the cost of any such project not to exceed four million dollars ($4,000,000.00) for any one county board of supervisors. The agricultural and industrial board shall require such safeguards and controls for the proper accomplishment of such projects as shall be deemed appropriate. However, the said agricultural and industrial board shall observe all procedures, regulations and requirements of law with regard to public contracts and the letting thereof under the B.A.W.I. acts.

If the program provided by Sections 59-9-65 through 59-9-75 is terminated or discontinued for any reason in the future, all moneys in the “agricultural and industrial dredging and site preparation fund,” after payment of any outstanding costs in connection with any project undertaken, shall be transferred to the general fund of the state treasury on written certification of the director of the agricultural and industrial board that this program has been discontinued or terminated by said agricultural and industrial board, citing the statutory authority therefor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7605-23; Laws, 1956, ch. 199, § 23; Laws, 1967, Ex. Sess. ch. 6, §§ 1-3, eff from and after passage (approved June 29, 1967).

§ 59-9-73.
Negotiability and taxation of bonds issued under Sections 59-9-65 through 59-9-75.

All bonds and interest coupons issued under the provisions of Sections 59-9-65 through 59-9-75 shall be and are hereby declared to have all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the provisions of the Mississippi Uniform Commercial Code and in exercising the powers granted by said sections, the board shall not be required to and need not comply with the provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code. Such bonds and income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation within the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7605-23; Laws, 1956, ch. 199, § 23; Laws, 1967, Ex. Sess. ch. 6, §§ 1-3, eff from and after passage (approved June 29, 1967).

§ 59-9-75.
Proceedings for issuance and validation of bonds issued under Sections 59-9-65 through 59-9-75; applicability of debt limitations.

Sections 59-9-65 through 59-9-75, without reference to any other statute, shall be deemed to be full and complete authority for the issuance of such bonds by such county, and no proceedings shall be required for the issuance of such bonds other than those provided for and required herein, and the limitations of Sections 59-9-37 through 59-9-49, shall not be applicable to the bonds issued under the provisions of Sections 59-9-65 through 59-9-75 nor shall such bonds be included or computed in the statutory limitations of indebtedness of any such county, and all the necessary powers to be exercised by the board of supervisors of such county in order to carry out the provisions of Sections 59-9-65 through 59-9-75, are hereby conferred.

The bonds authorized under the authority of Sections 59-9-65 through 59-9-75 may, in the discretion of the board of supervisors of such county, be validated in the chancery court of such county in a manner and with the force and effect provided now or hereafter by Sections 31-13-1 through 31-13-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the validation of county, municipal, school district and other bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7605-23; Laws, 1956, ch. 199, § 23; Laws, 1967, Ex. Sess. ch. 6, §§ 1-3, eff from and after passage (approved June 29, 1967).

§ 59-9-77.
Construction of chapter.

This chapter, without reference to any other statute, shall be deemed full and complete authority for the issuance and sale of bonds as herein provided, and shall be construed as additional and alternative methods therefor, and none of the present restrictions, requirements, conditions, or limitations of law shall be applicable to the issuance and sale of bonds under this chapter, except as herein otherwise expressly limited, and no proceedings shall be required for the issuance of such bonds other than those provided for and required herein, and all powers necessary to be exercised by the board of supervisors of such county, and by the governing authorities of the municipality in which the port of entry is located in such county, in order to carry out the provisions of this chapter, are hereby conferred.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7605-21; Laws, 1956, ch. 199, § 21.

§ 59-9-79.
Validation of bonds.

Except as otherwise specifically provided in this chapter, the bonds issued under this chapter may, in the discretion of the board of supervisors, or the board of supervisors and the governing authorities of the municipality in which the port of entry is located in such county, be validated under Sections 31-13-1 through 31-13-11, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7605-22; Laws, 1956, ch. 199, § 22.

§ 59-9-81.
Applicability of debt limitation.

The bonds or other obligations issued by counties or municipalities pursuant to this chapter shall not constitute a debt within the meaning of any statutory limitation as to the amount of debt which may be incurred by any such county or by any such municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7605-23; Laws, 1956, ch. 199, § 23; Laws, 1967, Ex. Sess. ch. 6, §§ 1-3, eff from and after passage (approved June 29, 1967).

§ 59-9-83.
Exemption from taxation of bonds; negotiability.

Except as otherwise specifically provided in this chapter, all bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this chapter and any interest thereon or income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation, except gift, transfer and inheritance taxes, insofar as may be within the power of the State of Mississippi to provide and shall be negotiable instruments within the meaning of the law of merchants and the Mississippi Uniform Commercial Code.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7605-24; Laws, 1956, ch. 199, § 24.

§ 59-9-85.
Action to enforce contractual rights.

The State of Mississippi, any county acting through a county port authority or a county development commission, or any person, firm or corporation entering into any contract with any county, acting through a county port authority or a county development commission authorized by this chapter, shall be entitled to maintain any action in any court of competent jurisdiction against the State of Mississippi, the county and the county port authority and the county development commission to enforce any contractual right arising out of any such contract.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7605-06; Laws, 1956, ch. 199, § 6; Laws, 1958, ch. 226, § 6; Laws, 1960, ch. 345, § 1; Laws, 1961, 2nd Ex. Sess. ch. 3, § 1; Laws, 1967, Ex. Sess. ch. 5, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 433, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 462, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 30, 1971).